Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-312
Nebraska Arts Council; duties.

The duties of the council shall be:

(1) To stimulate and encourage throughout the state the study and presentation of the performing and fine arts and public interest and participation therein;

(2) To make such surveys as may be deemed advisable of public and private institutions within the state engaged in artistic and cultural activities, including, but not limited to, music, theatre, dance, painting, sculpture, architecture, and allied arts and crafts, and to make recommendations concerning appropriate methods to encourage participation in and appreciation of the arts to meet the legitimate needs and aspirations of persons in all parts of the state;

(3) To take such steps as may be necessary and appropriate to encourage public interest in the cultural heritage of our state and to expand the state's cultural resources; and

(4) To encourage and assist freedom of artistic expression essential for the well-being of the arts.

Laws 1973, LB 121, § 4.